Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-203
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-204 to 38-204.04 apply.

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 38;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-17,133;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 142;

Laws 2022, LB905, § 2.